Louisiana, session 2026, SB378.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2449.1 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2449.1. Revocation upon divorce; deferred compensation plans
A. A divorce of an individual from the individual's spouse revokes any
benefit payable to the former spouse by reason of the individual's death under any
pension, profit-sharing, retirement, or similar benefit plan, provided that the divorce
occurs after the beneficiary is designated, the parties remained divorced from each
other at the time of death, and no judgment or property-settlement agreement
expressly provides otherwise. If revocation occurs, the proceeds of the plan are
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-354 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 378
payable as if the former spouse had predeceased the decedent.
B. A payor is not liable for having made payment in good faith reliance on
the validity of a beneficiary designation affecting any pension, profit-sharing,
retirement, or similar benefit plan before the payor has received written notice of the
divorce, judgment, or property-settlement agreement at its home office or principal
office with notice that the beneficiary designation has been revoked under this
Section and has had a reasonable time within which to act.
C. This Section shall not apply to any beneficiary designation made pursuant
to the Louisiana Public Retirement Law.
D. The provisions of this Section shall be given prospective and
retroactive application.
Section 2. R.S. 22:911.1 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§911.1. Revocation upon divorce; beneficiary designation in life insurance and
annuity contracts
A. In all policies of life or endowment insurance and in all annuity contracts,
divorce revokes any revocable designation made by a divorced individual to the
former spouse, provided that the divorce occurs after the beneficiary is designated,
the parties remained divorced from each other at the time of death, and no judgment
or property-settlement agreement expressly provides otherwise. If revocation occurs,
the proceeds of the policy or annuity contract are payable as if the former spouse had
predeceased the decedent.
B. A payor is not liable for having made payment in good faith reliance on
the validity of a beneficiary designation affecting any insurance policy or annuity
before the payor has received written notice of the divorce, judgment, or property-
settlement agreement and has had a reasonable time within which to act.
C. The provisions of this Section shall be given prospective and
retroactive application.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-354 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 378